Missouri, session 2026, SB1374.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 329.010 and 329.050, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 329.010 and 329.050, to read as follows:
329.010. As used in this chapter, unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and terms
mean:
(1) "Accredited school of cosmetology or school of
manicuring", an establishment operated for the purpose of
teaching cosmetology as defined in this section and meeting
the criteria set forth under 34 C.F.R. Part 600, Sections
600.1 and 600.2;
(2) "Apprentice" or "student", a person who is engaged
in training within a cosmetology establishment or school,
and while so training performs any of the practices of the
classified occupations within this chapter under the
immediate direction and supervision of a licensed
cosmetologist or instructor;
(3) "Board", the state board of cosmetology and barber
examiners;

SB 1374 2
(4) "Cosmetologist", any person who, for compensation,
engages in the practice of cosmetology, as defined in
subdivision (5) of this section;
(5) "Cosmetology" includes performing or offering to
engage in any acts of the classified occupations of
cosmetology for compensation, which shall include:
(a) "Class CH - hairdresser" includes arranging,
dressing, curling, singeing, waving, permanent waving,
cleansing, cutting, bleaching, tinting, coloring or similar
work upon the hair of any person by any means; or removing
superfluous hair from the body of any person by means other
than electricity, or any other means of arching or tinting
eyebrows or tinting eyelashes. Class CH - hairdresser also
includes any person who either with the person's hands or
with mechanical or electrical apparatuses or appliances, or
by the use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics,
lotions or creams engages for compensation in any one or any
combination of the following: massaging, cleaning,
stimulating, manipulating, exercising, beautifying or
similar work upon the scalp, face, neck, arms or bust;
(b) "Class MO - manicurist" includes cutting,
trimming, polishing, coloring, tinting, cleaning or
otherwise beautifying a person's fingernails, applying
artificial fingernails, massaging, cleaning a person's hands
and arms; pedicuring, which includes cutting, trimming,
polishing, coloring, tinting, cleaning or otherwise
beautifying a person's toenails, applying artificial
toenails, massaging and cleaning a person's legs and feet;
(c) "Class CA - hairdressing and manicuring" includes
all practices of cosmetology, as defined in paragraphs (a)
and (b) of this subdivision;

SB 1374 3
(d) "Class E - estheticians" includes the use of
mechanical, electrical apparatuses or appliances, or by the
use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions
or creams, not to exceed ten percent phenol, engages for
compensation, either directly or indirectly, in any one, or
any combination, of the following practices: massaging,
cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, exercising,
beautifying or similar work upon the scalp, face, neck,
ears, arms, hands, bust, torso, legs or feet and removing
superfluous hair by means other than electric needle or any
other means of arching or tinting eyebrows or tinting
eyelashes, of any person;
(e) "Class EA - esthetics and manicuring" includes all
practices of cosmetology, as described in paragraphs (b) and
(d) of this subdivision;
(6) "Cosmetology establishment", that part of any
building wherein or whereupon any of the classified
occupations are practiced including any space rented within
a licensed establishment by a person licensed under this
chapter, for the purpose of rendering cosmetology services;
(7) "Cross-over license", a license that is issued to
any person who has met the licensure and examination
requirements for both barbering and cosmetology;
(8) "Hair braider", any person who, for compensation,
engages in the practice of hair braiding;
(9) "Hair braiding", in accordance with the
requirements of section 329.275, the use of techniques that
result in tension on hair strands or roots by twisting,
wrapping, waving, extending, locking, or braiding of the
hair by hand or mechanical device, but does not include the
application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other

SB 1374 4
preparations to alter the color of the hair or to
straighten, curl, or alter the structure of the hair;
(10) "Hairdresser", any person who, for compensation,
engages in the practice of cosmetology as defined in
paragraph (a) of subdivision (5) of this section;
(11) "Instructor", any person who is licensed to teach
cosmetology or any practices of cosmetology pursuant to this
chapter;
(12) "Manicurist", any person who, for compensation,
engages in any or all of the practices in paragraph (b) of
subdivision (5) of this section;
(13) "Parental consent", the written informed consent
of a minor's parent or legal guardian that must be obtained
prior to providing body waxing on or near the genitalia;
(14) "School of cosmetology" or "school of
manicuring", an establishment operated for the purpose of
teaching cosmetology as defined in subdivision (5) of this
section.
329.050. 1. Applicants for examination or licensure
pursuant to this chapter shall possess the following
qualifications:
(1) They shall provide documentation of successful
completion of courses approved by the board, have an
education equivalent to the successful completion of the
tenth grade, and be at least seventeen years of age;
(2) If the applicants are apprentices, they shall have
served and completed, as an apprentice under the supervision
of a licensed cosmetologist, the time and studies required
by the board which shall be no less than three thousand
hours for cosmetologists, and no less than eight hundred
hours for manicurists and no less than fifteen hundred hours
for esthetics. When the classified occupation of manicurist

SB 1374 5
is apprenticed in conjunction with the classified occupation
of esthetician, the apprentice shall be required to
successfully complete an apprenticeship of no less than a
total of two thousand three hundred hours. However, when
the classified occupation of manicurist is apprenticed in
conjunction with the classified occupation of cosmetologist,
the apprentice shall be required to successfully complete an
apprenticeship of no less than a total of three thousand
hours;
(3) If the applicants are students, they shall have
had the required time in a licensed school of no less than
one thousand five hundred hours training or the credit hours
determined by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of
Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, as amended, for the classification of
cosmetologist, with the exception of public vocational
technical schools in which a student shall complete no less
than one thousand two hundred twenty hours training. All
students shall complete no less than four hundred hours or
the credit hours determined by the formula in Subpart A of
Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, as amended, for the classification of
manicurist. All students shall complete no less than seven
hundred fifty hours or the credit hours determined by the
formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title
34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, for the
classification of esthetician. When the classified
occupation of manicurist is taken in conjunction with the
classified occupation of esthetician, the student shall be
required to complete the hours required for both
occupations. However, when the classified occupation of
manicurist is taken in conjunction with the classified

SB 1374 6
occupation of cosmetologist, the student shall not be
required to serve the extra four hundred hours or the credit
hours determined by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of
Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, as amended, otherwise required to include
manicuring of nails; and
(4) They shall have passed an examination to the
satisfaction of the board.
2. A person may apply to take the examination required
by subsection 1 of this section if the person is a graduate
of a school of cosmetology or apprentice program in another
state or territory of the United States which has
substantially the same requirements as an educational
establishment licensed pursuant to this chapter. A person
may apply to take the examination required by subsection 1
of this section if the person is a graduate of an
educational establishment in a foreign country that provides
training for a classified occupation of cosmetology, as
defined by section 329.010, and has educational requirements
that are substantially the same requirements as an
educational establishment licensed under this chapter. The
board has sole discretion to determine the substantial
equivalency of such educational requirements. The board may
require that transcripts from foreign schools be submitted
for its review, and the board may require that the applicant
provide an approved English translation of such transcripts.
3. Each application shall contain a statement that,
subject to the penalties of making a false affidavit or
declaration, the application is made under oath or
affirmation and that its representations are true and
correct to the best knowledge and belief of the person
signing the application.

SB 1374 7
4. The sufficiency of the qualifications of applicants
shall be determined by the board, but the board may delegate
this authority to its executive director subject to such
provisions as the board may adopt.
5. Applications for examination or licensure may be
denied if the applicant has pleaded guilty to, entered a
plea of nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of
the following offenses or offenses of a similar nature
established under the laws of this state, any other state,
the United States, or any other country, notwithstanding
whether sentence is imposed:
(1) Any dangerous felony as defined under section
556.061 or murder in the first degree;
(2) Any of the following sexual offenses: rape in the
first degree, forcible rape, rape, statutory rape in the
first degree, statutory rape in the second degree, rape in
the second degree, sexual assault, sodomy in the first
degree, forcible sodomy, statutory sodomy in the first
degree, statutory sodomy in the second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, child molestation in the
second degree, sodomy in the second degree, deviate sexual
100 assault, sexual misconduct involving a child, sexual
101 misconduct in the first degree under section 566.090 as it
102 existed prior to August 28, 2013, sexual abuse under section
103 566.100 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013, sexual abuse
104 in the first or second degree, enticement of a child, or
105 attempting to entice a child;
106 (3) Any of the following offenses against the family
107 and related offenses: incest, abandonment of a child in the
108 first degree, abandonment of a child in the second degree,
109 endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree,
110 abuse of a child, using a child in a sexual performance,

SB 1374 8
111 promoting sexual performance by a child, or trafficking in
112 children; and
113 (4) Any of the following offenses involving child
114 pornography and related offenses: promoting obscenity in
115 the first degree, promoting obscenity in the second degree
116 when the penalty is enhanced to a class E felony, promoting
117 child pornography in the first degree, promoting child
118 pornography in the second degree, possession of child
119 pornography in the first degree, possession of child
120 pornography in the second degree, furnishing child
121 pornography to a minor, furnishing pornographic materials to
122 minors, or coercing acceptance of obscene material.
✓